Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-307
School districts; numbering.

The Commissioner of Education shall assign a number to each public school district within this state.

Laws 1971, LB 528, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-312.01;

Laws 1988, LB 1142, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-301;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 135.